Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-322 Applicability of claims
settlement provisions to loss claims. Section 431:15-310(a)(18), section
431:15-325 through section 431:15-328, section 431:15-333, section
431:15-403(c), section 431:15-406, and section 431:15-407 do not apply to loss
claims to the extent that they are subject to article 16 or to corresponding
laws of other states. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next